Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1007.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 12.40.060 and 1984 c 258 s 63 are each amended to read as follows:The notice of claim directed to the defendant shall contain: (1) The name and address of the plaintiff; (2) a brief and concise statement of the nature and amount of the claim; (3) a statement directing and requiring defendant to appear personally in the small claims department at a time certain, which shall not be less than five days from the date of service of the notice; and (4) a statement advising the defendant that in case of his or her failure to appear, judgment ((will))may be given against defendant for the amount of the claim.--- END ---